Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.240

Action on bond—Fraud of licensee.

Any vendor or consignor creditor claiming to be injured by the fraud of any licensee may bring action upon said bond against both principal and surety in any court of competent jurisdiction to recover the damages caused by such fraud.

[ 1959 c 107 s 24.]